North Carolina, session 2025, HB150.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 2 of Article 3A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding the following new sections to read:
"§ 143-64.5A. Certain educational institutions exempt.
Notwithstanding any provisions or limitations of Part 2 of this Article, an educational
organization is authorized and empowered to obtain decommissioned and surplus material and
property under contracts and agreements with the federal government or any of its departments
or agencies provided that the material and property is intended to be used for educational
purposes. For the purposes of this section, the term "educational organization" means an
organization that has education as its primary purpose and that is a nonprofit organization, a
not-for-profit organization, or an organization that has tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. §
501(c)(3).
"§ 143-64.5B. Public safety exemption.
Notwithstanding any provisions or limitations of Part 2 of this Article, any State agency is
authorized and empowered to obtain decommissioned and surplus material and property under
contracts and agreements with the federal government or any of its departments or agencies
provided that the material and property is intended to promote public safety. For the purposes of
this section, the term "State agency" means any board, bureau, commission, department,
institution, or agency of the State."
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any provision of S.L. 2023-134 to the contrary, the
sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department
of Public Instruction to contract with MyScholar, LLC, shall instead be allocated to the
Department of Administration for use by the Commission on Indian Affairs to contract with
MyScholar, LLC, to support the ScholarPath platform in developing the Twelfth Grade
Transition Program for Indian Education students in grades six through 12 to match students with
pathways aligned with their career interests.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H150-v-2*